Hawaii statutes.
[§431:20-106.5] Escrow depositories.
Any title insurer or insurer which operates as an escrow depository as defined
in chapter 449 shall be licensed in accordance with chapter 449. [L 1996, c 27,
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next